Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.045

Speech-language pathology services—Complaints.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall report to the department of health:

(a) Any complaint or disciplinary action taken against a certified educational staff associate providing speech-language pathology services in a school setting; and

(b) Any complaint the superintendent receives regarding a speech-language pathology assistant certified under chapter 18.35 RCW.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall make the reports required by this section as soon as practicable, but in no case later than five business days after the complaint or disciplinary action.

[ 2009 c 301 s 13.]

NOTES:

Intent—Implementation—2009 c 301: See notes following RCW 18.35.010.

Speech-language pathology assistants—Certification requirements—2009 c 301: See note following RCW 18.35.040.